District of Columbia statutes.
47-3603

Contracts for services.

(a)

The Mayor may select 1 or more contractors to provide such services as may be part of the employee deferred compensation program.

(b)

The cost of any contract for provision of such services as may be part of the employee deferred compensation program shall be financed solely from employee contributions to the employee deferred compensation program or from a fund or funds established to administer the employee deferred compensation program.

Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-118, § 4, 31 DCR 4034
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-3603.